Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 5A Remedies for Residents of Personal Care Homes

31-8-130.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Remedies for Residents of Personal Care Homes Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-130

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.

31-8-131.
Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly finds that persons residing within personal care homes are often isolated from the community and often lack the means to assert fully their rights as individual citizens.
The General Assembly also recognizes that in order for the rights of residents of personal care homes to be fully protected, residents must be afforded a means of recourse when such rights have been denied.
It is therefore the intent of the General Assembly to preserve the dignity and personal integrity of residents of personal care homes by providing access to a legal process to hear and redress the grievances of such residents regarding their individual rights.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-131

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.

31-8-132.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administrator” means the manager designated by the governing body of a personal care home as responsible for the day-to-day management, administration, and supervision of the personal care home, who may also serve as on-site manager and responsible staff person except during periods of his or her own absence.

“Community ombudsman” means a person certified as a community ombudsman pursuant to Code Section 31-8-52.

(2.1)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Governing body” means the board of trustees, the partnership, the corporation, the association, or the person or group of persons who maintain and control a personal care home and who are legally responsible for the operation of the home.

“Legal surrogate” means a duly appointed person who is authorized to act, within the scope of the authority granted under the legal surrogate’s appointment, on behalf of a resident who is adjudicated or certified incapacitated. No member of the governing body, administration, or staff of a personal care home or any affiliated personal care home or their family members may serve as the legal surrogate for a resident.

“Personal care home” or “home” means a facility as defined in Code Section 31-7-12 and shall include any assisted living community as defined in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-12.2 that is subject to regulation and licensure by the department.

“Representative” means a person who voluntarily, with the resident’s written authorization, may act upon the resident’s direction with regard to matters concerning the health and welfare of the resident, including being able to access personal records contained in the resident’s file and receive information and notices pertaining to the resident’s overall care and condition. No member of the governing body, administration, or staff of a personal care home or any affiliated personal care home or their family members may serve as the representative for a resident.

“Resident” means a person who resides in a personal care home.

“State ombudsman” means the state ombudsman established under Code Section 31-8-52.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-132

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 20/SB 178; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-13/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-133.
Residents’ rights.

Residents’ rights shall include all rights enumerated in the rules and regulations of the Department of Community Health, including, but not limited to, procedural protections relating to admission, transfer, or discharge of residents.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-133

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 31/HB 1387.

31-8-134.
Grievance procedure.

Any resident, or the representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, who believes his or her rights under this article have been violated by a personal care home or its governing body, administrator, or employee shall be permitted to file a grievance under this Code section.

In order to file the grievance provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the resident, or representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, may submit an oral or written grievance to the administrator or the administrator’s designee. The administrator or designee, within five business days, shall either resolve the grievance to the grievant’s satisfaction or respond in writing to the grievance, including in the response a description of the review and appeal rights set forth in this article.

If the person filing the grievance is not satisfied by the action or failure to act of the administrator or designee, the grievant may submit an oral or written complaint to the state or community ombudsman.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-134

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.

31-8-135.
Hearing; transfer of resident.

Any resident, the representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, or the state or community ombudsman, who believes the resident’s rights have been violated by a personal care home, its governing body, administrator, or employee, shall have the right to request a hearing from the department pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

No person shall be prohibited from requesting a hearing pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section for failure to exhaust any rights to other relief granted under this article.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the hearing provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be conducted within 45 days of the receipt by the department of the request for a hearing. Where the state or community ombudsman has not already been involved in the matter at issue, the department may refer the request for a hearing to the state or community ombudsman for informal resolution pending the hearing. Such referral shall not extend the 45 day period in which the department shall conduct such hearing.

If a resident or a resident’s legal surrogate or representative, if any, alleges that an action or failure to act by a personal care home or its governing body, administrator, or employee is in retaliation for the exercise by that resident or his or her representative or legal surrogate, if any, of a right conferred by state or federal law or court order, the hearing provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be conducted within 15 days of the receipt of the department of the request for a hearing. For such hearing, all pending requests for hearing by the resident or his or her legal surrogate or representative, if any, relating to such resident shall be consolidated.

No transfer of a resident shall take place until all appeal rights are exhausted, unless:

An immediate transfer is necessary because the resident develops a physical or mental condition requiring continuous medical or nursing care; or

The resident’s continuing behavior or condition directly and substantially threatens the health, safety, and welfare of the resident or any other resident.

The department shall hold any hearing provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section at the personal care home upon the resident’s request or as necessary due to the resident’s physical condition. Where two or more residents of a personal care home allege a common complaint, the department may at the residents’ request schedule a single hearing.

If the department finds no violations of this article, the resident and personal care home will be so informed. If a violation has occurred:

The hearing officer shall so notify the staff within the department responsible for the licensure of personal care homes;

The department shall order the personal care home to correct such violation; and

Upon failure of the personal care home to correct such violation within a reasonable time, the department may impose appropriate civil penalties as provided for in Code Section 31-2-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-135

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-136.
Action for damages.

Any resident or the representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover actual and punitive damages against a personal care home or its governing body, administrator, or employee for any violation of the rights of a resident granted under this article. Upon referral and request by the department, the Attorney General may bring such an action. Where a violation of a resident’s rights has been found, the resident shall be awarded the actual damages or $1,000.00, whichever is greater, and may be awarded punitive damages.

No person shall be prohibited from maintaining an action pursuant to this Code section for failure to exhaust any rights to administrative or other relief granted under this article.

The right of a resident to bring an action pursuant to this Code section is in addition to any and all other rights, remedies, or causes of action the resident may have by statute or at common law.

Any resident or the representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, may bring an action to recover damages for any action of a personal care home or its governing body, administrator, or employee that adversely affects the resident’s rights, privileges, or living arrangement in retaliation for that resident or his or her representative or legal surrogate, if any, having exercised a right conferred by state or federal law or court order. Upon referral and request by the department, the Attorney General may bring such an action. In any action brought under this Code section alleging retaliation, there shall be a presumption of retaliatory conduct, rebuttable by a showing of clear and convincing evidence, if an owner, licensee, administrator, or employee attempts to discharge, transfer, or relocate a resident involuntarily within six months after that resident or his or her representative or legal surrogate, if any, files an action for relief under this Code section, exercises a right to a hearing under this article, or makes an oral or written grievance against the personal care home or its governing body, administrator, or employee to the personal care home, a state or community ombudsman, or a state government official or employee.

Code Section 31-5-8 shall apply fully to any willful violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-136

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.

31-8-137.
Temporary restraining order; injunctions.

A resident, the representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, or the Attorney General may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to enjoin a personal care home from violating the rights of a resident.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-137

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.

31-8-138.
Failure to validly license as defense.

The failure of the governing body to obtain or maintain a valid license to operate a personal care home shall not constitute a defense to any action brought pursuant to this article where the facility at issue is subject to licensure as a personal care home.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-138

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.

31-8-139.
Mandamus.

A resident, the representative or legal surrogate of the resident, if any, the community ombudsman, the governing body of the personal care home, or any other interested party may bring an action in court for mandamus pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 9 to order the department to comply with any state or federal law relevant to the operation of a personal care home or the care of its residents.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-139

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 2.